District of Columbia statutes.
34-2401.22

Penalty for damaging or defacing water pipes.

Every person who maliciously breaks, injures, defaces, or destroys any main or pipe, bend, branch, valve, hydrant, service pipe, or any other fixture used for the distribution of water throughout the streets and avenues, or for its introduction into the houses, tenements, or buildings of the District of Columbia, shall be punishable by imprisonment in the District jail for not more than 2 years.

R.S., D.C., § 220
Feb. 25, 1885, 23 Stat. 319, ch. 145
1981 Ed., § 43-1548.
1973 Ed., § 43-1536.